Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 31
TRIBAL-STATE GAMING COMPACT

Editor's note:

This article 31 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 31, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

44-31-101. Tribal-state gaming compact.

In accordance with federal Indian gaming regulations in 25 U.S.C. sec. 2710 (d)(3)(C), any Indian tribe having jurisdiction over the Indian lands upon which class III gaming activity is being conducted or is to be conducted shall request the governor of Colorado on behalf of this state to enter into negotiations for the purpose of entering into a tribal-state compact governing the conduct of gaming activities. Upon receiving a request, the governor shall negotiate, after consultation with the Colorado limited gaming control commission created in section 44-30-301, with the Indian tribe in good faith to enter a compact.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 236, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.2-101 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-31-102. Effective date of compact.

The tribal-state compact entered into between the governor and an Indian tribe governing gaming activities on the Indian lands of the Indian tribe shall take effect when notice of approval of the compact by the secretary of the federal department of the interior has been published by said secretary in the federal register.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 236, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.2-102 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-31-103. Provisions of compact.

Any tribal-state compact entered into pursuant to section 44-31-101 may include, but shall not be limited to, the following provisions:

The application of the criminal and civil laws and regulations of the Indian tribe or of this state that are directly related to, and necessary for, the licensing and regulation of the activity;

The allocation of criminal and civil jurisdiction between this state and the Indian tribe necessary for the enforcement of the laws and regulations;

The assessment by this state of such activities in such amounts as are necessary to defray the costs of regulating such activity;

Taxation by the Indian tribe of the activity in amounts comparable to amounts assessed by this state for comparable activities;

Remedies for breach of contract;

Standards for the operation of the activity and maintenance of the gaming facility, including licensing; and

Any other subjects that are directly related to the operation of gaming activities.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the restrictions set forth in section 9 of article XVIII of the state constitution shall apply to limited gaming activities on tribal lands.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 236, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.2-103 as it existed prior to 2018.